Utah statutes.
54-10a-201.   Office of Consumer Services -- Director.

(1)  There is created within the Department of Commerce the "Office of Consumer Services."

(2) (a)  The governor shall appoint, with the concurrence of the Committee of Consumer Services and the consent of the Senate, a qualified person in the field of public utilities to be the director of the office.

(b)  The director shall serve for a term of six years.

(c)  For purposes of the individual who is the director on May 12, 2009, that individual's six-year term is considered to begin on July 1, 2009.

(d)  The governor may remove the director for cause.

(3)  In accordance with this chapter, the director shall on behalf of the office:

(a)  represent residential consumers and small commercial consumers of an applicable public utility; and

(b)  represent the interests of:

(i)  residential consumers; and

(ii)  small commercial consumers.

